Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Chapter 6. Motor Vehicle and Boat Replacement Program

§ 49-6-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the following words are defined as follows:

“Commission” means the Mississippi Commission on Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks.

“Executive director” means the chief officer of the department.

“Motor vehicle” means passenger automobiles, trucks, heavy trucks, tractors, graders, other heavy motor-driven equipment, and all-terrain vehicles.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 465, § 1; Laws, 1978, ch. 465, § 15; Laws, 1994, ch. 453, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1994).

§ 49-6-3.
Wildlife Fisheries and Parks Motor Vehicle Fund; creation; funding; administration.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be known as the “Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks Motor Vehicle Fund.” All funds derived from the sale of used motor vehicles, funds transferred from the “Game and Fish Protection Fund” and any other funds which may be needed for the purchase of motor vehicles, boats and outboard motors shall be deposited into this special fund. Other funds as needed may be transferred by the commission from the department’s regular support appropriation. The commission may transfer funds from the motor vehicle fund to the game and fish protection fund as needed for the operation of the department. The motor vehicle fund is a special trust fund and the interest earned thereon shall be credited to the fund.

The commission shall adopt regulations for the administration of the fund. The executive director shall administer the fund and expenditures may be made from the fund upon requisition by the executive director. The department shall spend monies in the fund by an annual appropriation approved by the Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 465, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 453, § 2; Laws, 2004, ch. 595, § 25, eff from and after July 1, 2004.

§ 49-6-5.
Motor vehicle replacement program; standards.

The department shall establish and implement a motor vehicle replacement program to ensure the efficient and effective operation of the department. The program shall include replacement standards based on the type, operational environment and use of each motor vehicle and any other factors necessary for cost-effective determination of replacement needs.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1977, ch. 465, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 453, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1994).

§§ 49-6-7 and 49-6-9.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1994, ch. 453, §§ 4, 5 eff from and after passage (approved March 21, 1994).

[Laws, 1977, ch. 465, § 1]